praksid/praks2/naide2.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N                ! Nimisõna
+A                ! Omadussõna
+Sg
+Pl
+Nom
+Gen
+Par
+All              ! alaeütlev

%>                ! morfeemi piir
%{NA%}            ! nõrk aste

G1                ! g või null
B1                ! b või null
D1                ! d või null

LEXICON Root

koli+N:koli tüüp_ema ;    ! leksikaalne pool : pindesitus
kena+A:kena tüüp_ema ;    ! pl par keni on puudu
sugu+N:suG1u tüüp_ema ;
vidin+N:vidin tüüp_vidin ;
redel+N:redel tüüp_redel ;
torssis+A:torssis # ;

LEXICON tüüp_ema
  +Sg+Nom: # ;
         :%{NA%} sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Par:%> # ;              ! kas %> peaks siin üldse olema ?
      +Pl:%>de semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Par:%>sid # ;
    
LEXICON tüüp_vidin
  +Sg+Nom: # ;
         :a 2C; 

LEXICON tüüp_redel
  +Sg+Nom: # ;
         :i 2C; 

LEXICON 2C
         : sg_gen_jt ; 
  +Sg+Par:%>t # ;
      +Pl:%>te semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Par:%>id # ;


LEXICON sg_gen_jt

  +Sg+Gen: # ;
         : semkäänded ;
  +Pl+Nom:%>d # ;
  

LEXICON semkäänded

    +All:%>le # ;
